Utah statutes.
63M-1-1002.   Confidential information.

(1)  A state agency having access under federal law to biotechnology trade secrets and related confidential information shall manage the trade secrets and related confidential records as protected records under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(2)  The records described in this section may be disclosed under the balancing provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, when a determination is made that disclosure is essential for the protection of the public's health or environment.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

